Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-904.01
Firearm-related disability, defined.

Firearm-related
disability means a person is not permitted to (1) purchase, possess, ship,
transport, or receive a firearm under either state or federal law, (2) obtain
a certificate to purchase, lease, rent, or receive transfer of a handgun under
section 69-2404, or (3) obtain a permit to carry a concealed handgun under
the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2011, LB512, § 7.

Concealed Handgun Permit Act, see section 69-2427.